Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 73

Arkansas Trust Code

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions and Definitions

28-73-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Arkansas Trust Code.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-102. Scope.

This chapter applies to express trusts, charitable or noncharitable, and trusts created pursuant to a statute, judgment, or decree that requires the trust to be administered in the manner of an express trust.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), this chapter does not apply to public trusts that are governed by § 28-72-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-103. Definitions. [Effective until January 1, 2020.]

In this chapter:

“Action”, with respect to an act of a trustee, includes a failure to act.

“Ascertainable standard” means a standard relating to an individual's health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or Section 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on September 1, 2005.

“Beneficiary” means a person that:

has a present or future beneficial interest in a trust, vested or contingent; or

in a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a power of appointment over trust property.

“Charitable trust” means a trust, or portion of a trust, created for a charitable purpose described in § 28-73-405(a).

“Community property” means all personal property, wherever situated, which was acquired as or became, and remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction, and all real property situated in another jurisdiction which is community property under the laws of that jurisdiction.

“Conservator” means a person appointed by the court pursuant to § 28-67-101 et seq. to administer the estate of an individual who by reason of advanced age or physical disability is unable to manage his or her property.

“Environmental law” means a federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment.

“Guardian” means a person appointed by a court pursuant to § 28-65-101 et seq. to have the care and custody of the estate of an incapacitated person.

“Interests of the beneficiaries” means the beneficial interests provided in the terms of the trust.

“Jurisdiction”, with respect to a geographic area, includes a state or country.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Power of withdrawal” means a presently exercisable general power of appointment other than a power exercisable by a trustee which is limited by an ascertainable standard, or which is exercisable by another person only upon consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership, whether real or personal, legal or equitable, or any interest therein.

“Qualified beneficiary” means a living beneficiary who on the date the beneficiary's qualification is determined:

is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in subdivision (14)(A) terminated on that date, but the termination of those interests would not cause the trust to terminate; or

would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

“Revocable”, as applied to a trust, means revocable by the settlor without the consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

“Settlor” means a person, including a testator, who creates, or contributes property to, a trust. If more than one (1) person creates or contributes property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the portion of the trust property attributable to that person's contribution, except to the extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that portion.

“Spendthrift provision” means a term of a trust which restrains both voluntary and involuntary transfer of a beneficiary's interest.

“State” means a State of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

“Terms of a trust” means the manifestation of the settlor's intent regarding a trust's provisions as expressed in the trust instrument or as may be established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial proceeding.

“Trust instrument” means an instrument executed by the settlor that contains terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto.

“Trustee” includes an original, additional, successor trustee, and a cotrustee.

U.S. Code. Sections 2041(b)(1)(A) and 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in (2), are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 2041(b)(1)(A) and 2514(c)(1) respectively.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

Because the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (ICWA), 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., did not apply to the adoption of the minor child because she was not an “Indian child” as defined in 25 U.S.C. § 1903(4), this section did not serve as Arkansas recognition of the tribe and did not apply to grant Indian child status to the minor child. Vick v. Cecil (In re A.M.C.), 368 Ark. 369, 246 S.W.3d 426 (2007).

Circuit court erred in applying the cy pres doctrine to reform a testamentary trust because the testator created the trust for the administration of four life estates with the remainder to two churches, which vested on the testator's death, there was no provision that the devise was to serve a charitable purpose or that restricted the churches from using the proceeds for noncharitable purposes, and neither the trustee nor the churches was directed to ensure that the use of the property be for a purpose benefiting any charity.Covenant Presbytery v. First Baptist Church, 2016 Ark. 138, 489 S.W.3d 153 (2016).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-103. Definitions. [Effective January 1, 2020.]

In this chapter:

“Action”, with respect to an act of a trustee, includes a failure to act.

“Ascertainable standard” means a standard relating to an individual's health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or Section 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on September 1, 2005.

“Beneficiary” means a person that:

has a present or future beneficial interest in a trust, vested or contingent; or

in a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a power of appointment over trust property.

“Charitable trust” means a trust, or portion of a trust, created for a charitable purpose described in § 28-73-405(a).

“Community property” means all personal property, wherever situated, which was acquired as or became, and remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction, and all real property situated in another jurisdiction which is community property under the laws of that jurisdiction.

“Conservator” means a person appointed by the court pursuant to § 28-67-101 et seq. to administer the estate of an individual who by reason of advanced age or physical disability is unable to manage his or her property.

“Environmental law” means a federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment.

“Guardian” means a person appointed by a court pursuant to § 28-65-101 et seq. to have the care and custody of the estate of an incapacitated person.

“Interests of the beneficiaries” means the beneficial interests provided in the terms of the trust.

“Jurisdiction”, with respect to a geographic area, includes a state or country.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Power of withdrawal” means a presently exercisable general power of appointment other than a power exercisable by a trustee which is limited by an ascertainable standard, or which is exercisable by another person only upon consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership, whether real or personal, legal or equitable, or any interest therein.

“Qualified beneficiary” means a living beneficiary who on the date the beneficiary's qualification is determined:

is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in subdivision (14)(A) terminated on that date, but the termination of those interests would not cause the trust to terminate; or

would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

“Revocable”, as applied to a trust, means revocable by the settlor without the consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

“Settlor” means a person, including a testator, who creates, or contributes property to, a trust. If more than one (1) person creates or contributes property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the portion of the trust property attributable to that person's contribution, except to the extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that portion.

“Spendthrift provision” means a term of a trust which restrains both voluntary and involuntary transfer of a beneficiary's interest.

“State” means a State of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

“Terms of a trust” means:

except as otherwise provided in § 28-76-102(8)(B), the manifestation of the settlor's intent regarding a trust's provisions as:

expressed in the trust instrument; or

established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial proceeding; or

the trust's provisions as established, determined, or amended by:

a trustee or trust director in accordance with applicable law;

court order; or

a nonjudicial settlement agreement under § 28-73-111.

“Trust instrument” means an instrument executed by the settlor that contains terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto.

“Trustee” includes an original, additional, successor trustee, and a cotrustee.

Publisher's Notes. For text of section effective until January 1, 2020, see the bound volume.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the (19)(A), (19)(A)(i), and (19)(A)(ii) designations; added “except as otherwise provided in §28-76-102(8)(B)” in the introductory language of (19)(A); in (19)(A)(ii), deleted “as may be” preceding “established” and added “or”; added (19)(B); and made stylistic changes.

U.S. Code. Sections 2041(b)(1)(A) and 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in (2), are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 2041(b)(1)(A) and 2514(c)(1) respectively.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 1021, § 6: Jan. 1, 2020.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

Because the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (ICWA), 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., did not apply to the adoption of the minor child because she was not an “Indian child” as defined in 25 U.S.C. § 1903(4), this section did not serve as Arkansas recognition of the tribe and did not apply to grant Indian child status to the minor child. Vick v. Cecil (In re A.M.C.), 368 Ark. 369, 246 S.W.3d 426 (2007).

Circuit court erred in applying the cy pres doctrine to reform a testamentary trust because the testator created the trust for the administration of four life estates with the remainder to two churches, which vested on the testator's death, there was no provision that the devise was to serve a charitable purpose or that restricted the churches from using the proceeds for noncharitable purposes, and neither the trustee nor the churches was directed to ensure that the use of the property be for a purpose benefiting any charity.Covenant Presbytery v. First Baptist Church, 2016 Ark. 138, 489 S.W.3d 153 (2016).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1; 2019, No. 1021, § 1.

28-73-104. Knowledge.

Subject to subsection (b), a person has knowledge of a fact if the person:

has actual knowledge of it;

has received a notice or notification of it; or

from all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time in question, has reason to know it.

An organization that conducts activities through employees has notice or knowledge of a fact involving a trust only from the time the information was received by an employee having responsibility to act for the trust or would have been brought to the employee's attention if the organization had exercised reasonable diligence. An organization exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the employee having responsibility to act for the trust and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an employee of the organization to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual's regular duties or the individual knows a matter involving the trust would be materially affected by the information.

the requirements for creating a trust;

subject to §§28-76-109, 28-76-111, and 28-76-112 of the Uniform Directed Trust Act, § 28-76-101 et seq., the duty of a trustee to act in good faith and in accordance with the purposes of the trust;

the requirement that a trust and its terms be for the benefit of its beneficiaries, and that the trust have a purpose that is lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve;

the power of a court to modify or terminate a trust under §§ 28-73-410 — 28-73-416;

the effect of a spendthrift provision and the rights of certain creditors and assignees to reach a trust as provided in § 28-73-501 et seq.;

the power of a court under § 28-73-702 to require, dispense with, or modify or terminate a bond;

the power of a court under § 28-73-708(b) to adjust a trustee's compensation specified in the terms of the trust which is unreasonably low or high;

the rights under §§ 28-73-1010 — 28-73-1013 of a person other than a trustee or beneficiary;

periods of limitation for commencing a judicial proceeding;

the power of a court to take such action and exercise such jurisdiction as may be necessary in the interests of justice; and

the subject-matter jurisdiction of a court for commencing a proceeding as provided in § 28-73-203.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added “subject to §§28-76-109,28-76-111, and28-76-112 of the Uniform Directed Trust Act” in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 1021, § 6: Jan. 1, 2020.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lucy L. Holifield, Note: Property Law—Upending the Familiar Tools of Estate Planning: Equity Renders Revocable Trusts Subject to the Arkansas Spousal Election. In re Estate of Thompson, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 75 (2015).

Consent of a secondary beneficiary to trust amendments was not required because the express terms of the trusts permitted the amendments at issue.Dawson v. Stoner-Sellers, 2019 Ark. 410, 591 S.W.3d 299 (2019).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-105. Default and mandatory rules.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, this chapter governs the duties and powers of a trustee, relations among trustees, and the rights and interests of a beneficiary.

The terms of a trust prevail over any provision of this chapter except:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1; 2019, No. 1021, § 2.

28-73-106. Common law of trusts — Principles of equity.

The common law of trusts and principles of equity supplement this chapter, except to the extent modified by this chapter or another statute of this state.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-107. Governing law.

The meaning and effect of the terms of a trust are determined by:

the law of the jurisdiction designated in the terms unless the designation of that jurisdiction's law is contrary to a strong public policy of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue; or

in the absence of a controlling designation in the terms of the trust, the law of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-108. Principal place of administration.

Without precluding other means for establishing a sufficient connection with the designated jurisdiction, terms of a trust designating the principal place of administration are valid and controlling if:

a trustee's principal place of business is located in or a trustee is a resident of the designated jurisdiction; or

all or part of the administration occurs in the designated jurisdiction.

A trustee is under a continuing duty to administer the trust at a place appropriate to its purposes, its administration, and the interests of the beneficiaries.

Without precluding the right of a court to order, approve, or disapprove a transfer, the trustee, in furtherance of the duty prescribed by subsection (b), may transfer the trust's principal place of administration to another state or to a jurisdiction outside of the United States.

The trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of a proposed transfer of a trust's principal place of administration not less than sixty (60) days before initiating the transfer. The notice of proposed transfer must include:

the name of the jurisdiction to which the principal place of administration is to be transferred;

the address and telephone number at the new location at which the trustee can be contacted;

an explanation of the reasons for the proposed transfer;

the date on which the proposed transfer is anticipated to occur; and

the date, not less than sixty (60) days after the giving of the notice, by which the qualified beneficiary must notify the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer.

The authority of a trustee under this section to transfer a trust's principal place of administration terminates if a qualified beneficiary notifies the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer on or before the date specified in the notice.

In connection with a transfer of the trust's principal place of administration, the trustee may transfer some or all of the trust property to a successor trustee designated in the terms of the trust or appointed pursuant to § 28-73-704.

Subsections (d) and (e) apply only to irrevocable trusts created on or after September 1, 2005, and to revocable trusts which become irrevocable on or after September 1, 2005.

is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal upon termination of the interests of other distributees or permissible distributees then receiving or eligible to receive distributions; or

would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

the resignation or appointment of a trustee and the determination of a trustee's compensation;

transfer of a trust's principal place of administration; and

liability of a trustee for an action relating to the trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-109. Methods and waiver of notice.

Notice to a person under this chapter or the sending of a document to a person under this chapter must be accomplished in a manner reasonably suitable under the circumstances and likely to result in receipt of the notice or document. Permissible methods of notice or for sending a document include first-class mail, personal delivery, delivery to the person's last known place of residence or place of business, or a properly directed electronic message.

Notice otherwise required under this chapter or a document otherwise required to be sent under this chapter need not be provided to a person whose identity or location is unknown to and not reasonably ascertainable by the trustee.

Notice under this chapter or the sending of a document under this chapter may be waived by the person to be notified or sent the document.

Notice of a judicial proceeding must be given as provided in the applicable rules of civil procedure.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-110. Others treated as qualified beneficiaries.

Whenever notice to qualified beneficiaries of a trust is required under this chapter, the trustee must also give notice to any other beneficiary who has sent the trustee a request for notice.

A charitable organization expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of a charitable trust has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under this chapter if the charitable organization, on the date the charitable organization's qualification is being determined:

A person appointed to enforce a trust created for the care of an animal or another noncharitable purpose as provided in §28-73-408 or §28-73-409 has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under this chapter.

The Attorney General has the rights of a qualified beneficiary with respect to a charitable trust having its principal place of administration in this state.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-111. Nonjudicial settlement agreements.

For purposes of this section, “interested persons” means persons whose consent would be required in order to achieve a binding settlement were the settlement to be approved by the court.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), interested persons may enter into a binding nonjudicial settlement agreement with respect to any matter involving a trust.

A nonjudicial settlement agreement is valid only to the extent it does not violate a material purpose of the trust and includes terms and conditions that could be properly approved by the court under this chapter or other applicable law.

Matters that may be resolved by a nonjudicial settlement agreement include:

the interpretation or construction of the terms of the trust;

the approval of a trustee's report or accounting;

direction to a trustee to refrain from performing a particular act or the grant to a trustee of any necessary or desirable power;

Any interested person may request a court to approve a nonjudicial settlement agreement, to determine whether the representation as provided in §28-73-301 et seq. was adequate, and to determine whether the agreement contains terms and conditions a court could have properly approved.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-112. Rules of construction.

The rules of construction that apply in this state to the interpretation of and disposition of property by will also apply as appropriate to the interpretation of the terms of a trust and the disposition of the trust property.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Judicial Proceedings

28-73-201. Role of court in administration of trust.

A court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by an interested person or as provided by law.

A trust is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by the court.

A judicial proceeding involving a trust may relate to any matter involving the trust's administration, including a request for instructions and an action to declare rights.

Summons in a trust administration case qualified as a special circumstance and the circuit court did not abuse its discretion in denying a qualified trust beneficiary's motion to declare the service and process void and invalid; although the beneficiary argued that the summons was defective because the caption section said “Hamilton Living Trust” and did not name the trustee or the parties, the trustee had the summons issued in the name of the trust, as this section gave it the right to do, and the summons was directed to the beneficiary, who received it and filed a timely answer (decided under former version of Ark. R. Civ. P. 4).Hamilton v. Bank of the Ozarks (In re Hamilton Living Trust), 2019 Ark. App. 76, 571 S.W.3d 53 (2019).

Summons in a trust administration case qualified as a special circumstance and the circuit court did not abuse its discretion in denying a qualified trust beneficiary's motion to declare the service and process void and invalid; although the beneficiary argued that the summons was defective because the caption section said “Hamilton Living Trust” and did not name the trustee or the parties, the trustee had the summons issued in the name of the trust, as §28-73-201 gave it the right to do, and the summons was directed to the beneficiary, who received it and filed a timely answer (decided under former version of Ark. R. Civ. P. 4).Hamilton v. Bank of the Ozarks (In re Hamilton Living Trust), 2019 Ark. App. 76, 571 S.W.3d 53 (2019).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-202. Jurisdiction over trustee and beneficiary.

By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state or by moving the principal place of administration to this state, the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of a court of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.

With respect to their interests in the trust, the beneficiaries of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state are subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust. By accepting a distribution from such a trust, the recipient submits personally to the jurisdiction of a court of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.

This section does not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trustee, beneficiary, or other person receiving property from the trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-203. Subject-matter jurisdiction.

The circuit court has exclusive jurisdiction of proceedings in this state brought by a trustee or beneficiary concerning the administration of a trust or of other proceedings involving a trust.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Representation

28-73-301. Representation — Basic effect.

Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this subchapter has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this subchapter is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

Except as otherwise provided in §§ 28-73-411 and 28-73-602, a person who under this subchapter may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor's behalf.

A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this subchapter with respect to the termination or modification of a trust under § 28-73-411(a).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-302. Representation by holder of general testamentary power of appointment.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the holder of a general testamentary power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute, the holder may represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-303. Representation by fiduciaries and parents.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute:

a conservator may represent and bind the estate that the conservator controls;

a guardian may represent and bind the ward if a conservator of the ward's estate has not been appointed;

an agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

a trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

a personal representative of a decedent's estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate; and

a parent may represent and bind the parent's minor or unborn child if a guardian for the child has not been appointed.

Chapter 7 debtors who were guardians of a creditor had a fiduciary responsibility to the creditor created by §28-65-301(b)(2) and this section, and the debtors committed defalcation as fiduciaries by failing to hold the creditor's estate as directed by a court order and by failing to account for estate funds. Any debt that resulted from the debtors'defalcation was therefore nondischargeable under 11 U.S.C.S. § 523(a)(4).Anderson v. Sharp (In re Sharp), — B.R. —, 2008 Bankr. LEXIS 4270 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. Aug. 8, 2008).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-304. Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-305. Appointment of representative.

If a court determines that an interest is not represented under this subchapter, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to receive notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown. A guardian ad litem may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

A guardian ad litem may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this chapter, whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.

In making decisions, a guardian ad litem may consider general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual's family.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Creation, Validity, Modification, and Termination of Trust

28-73-401. Methods of creating trust.

A trust may be created by:

transfer of property to another person as trustee during the settlor's lifetime or by will or other disposition taking effect upon the settlor's death;

declaration by the owner of property that the owner holds identifiable property as trustee; or

exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a trustee.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-402. Requirements for creation.

A trust is created only if:

the settlor has capacity to create a trust;

the settlor indicates an intention to create the trust;

the trust has a definite beneficiary or is:

a charitable trust;

a trust for the care of an animal, as provided in § 28-73-408; or

a trust for a noncharitable purpose, as provided in § 28-73-409;

the trustee has duties to perform; and

the same person is not the sole trustee and sole beneficiary.

A beneficiary is definite if the beneficiary can be ascertained now or in the future, subject to any applicable rule against perpetuities.

A power in a trustee to select a beneficiary from an indefinite class is valid. If the power is not exercised within a reasonable time, the power fails and the property subject to the power passes to the persons who would have taken the property had the power not been conferred.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

Ark. L. Rev.

Christopher W. Wynne, Comment: WWJD: A True Neutral Principles Approach? Arkansas Courts Should Take Another Look, 65 Ark. L. Rev. 481 (2012).

Circuit court did not err in quieting title in favor of the worship center because, under the neutral-principles approach, nothing in the language of the deed suggested that the owner had the intention of creating a trust in favor of either the national church or the state church, and neither the national church nor the state church had an ownership interest in the property at the time of the conveyance and neither was a party to the transactionArkansas Annual Conf. of the AME Church, Inc. v. New Direction Praise & Worship Ctr., Inc., 375 Ark. 428, 291 S.W.3d 562, cert. denied, 558 U.S. 818, 130 S. Ct. 70, 175 L. Ed. 2d 26 (2009).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-403. Trusts created in other jurisdictions.

A trust not created by will is validly created if its creation complies with the law of the jurisdiction in which the trust instrument was executed, or the law of the jurisdiction in which, at the time of creation:

the settlor was domiciled, had a place of abode, or was a national;

a trustee was domiciled or had a place of business; or

any trust property was located.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-404. Trust purposes.

A trust may be created only to the extent its purposes are lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve. A trust and its terms must be for the benefit of its beneficiaries.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-405. Charitable purposes — Enforcement.

A charitable trust may be created for the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, governmental or municipal purposes, or other purposes the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

If the terms of a charitable trust do not indicate a particular charitable purpose or beneficiary, the court may select one (1) or more charitable purposes or beneficiaries. The selection must be consistent with the settlor's intention to the extent it can be ascertained.

The settlor of a charitable trust, among others, may maintain a proceeding to enforce the trust.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

While the regional medical center was not the same entity as the hospital that the decedent left the remainder of his property to if the named beneficiaries predeceased him, the regional medical center was the appropriate cy pres beneficiary because the entity that operated the hospital was the intended object of the decedent's bequest and the decedent had the charitable intent to promote public health when he made the devise to the hospital. Thus, the circuit court did not err in deciding that the decedent's estate should be used to further the patient-care and community programs that a new clinic would provide the community, and it fashioned a use for the funds as near to the decedent's intent as possible under the circumstances.In re Estate of Alexander, 2017 Ark. App. 588, 533 S.W.3d 618 (2017).

Circuit court erred in applying the cy pres doctrine to reform a testamentary trust because the testator created the trust for the administration of four life estates with the remainder to two churches, which vested on the testator's death, there was no provision that the devise was to serve a charitable purpose or that restricted the churches from using the proceeds for noncharitable purposes, and neither the trustee nor the churches was directed to ensure that the use of the property be for a purpose benefiting any charity.Covenant Presbytery v. First Baptist Church, 2016 Ark. 138, 489 S.W.3d 153 (2016).

Grantors'heirs had no legal standing to argue any issues concerning the enforcement of the charitable trust created by the subsequent deed as they were not the settlors who established the trust; and because they no longer possessed any interest in the property, they were not the “among others” contemplated in subsection (c) of this section.Stone v. Wash. Reg'l Med. Ctr., 2017 Ark. 90, 515 S.W.3d 104 (2017).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-406. Creation of trust induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

A trust is void to the extent its creation was induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-407. Evidence of oral trust.

Except as required by a statute other than this chapter, a trust need not be evidenced by a trust instrument, but the creation of an oral trust and its terms may be established only by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-408. Trust for care of animal.

A trust may be created to provide for the care of an animal alive during the settlor's lifetime. The trust terminates upon the death of the animal or, if the trust was created to provide for the care of more than one (1) animal alive during the settlor's lifetime, upon the death of the last surviving animal.

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by a court. A person having an interest in the welfare of the animal may request the court to appoint a person to enforce the trust or to remove a person appointed.

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent a court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use must be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor's successors in interest.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.

28-73-409. Noncharitable trust without ascertainable beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in §28-73-408 or by another statute, the following rules apply:

a trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable but otherwise valid purpose to be selected by the trustee. The trust may not be enforced for more than twenty-one (21) years;

a trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by a court; and

property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent a court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use must be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor's successors in interest.

Ark. L. Notes.

Circo, How Does the Arkansas Trust Code Affect Real Estate Transactions?, 2007 Ark. L. Notes 45.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1031, § 1.